Hawaii statutes.
§266-7 Department; duties. The
department of transportation shall collect all moneys, fees, and dues paid to
the State for wharfage, demurrage, and all other fees or compensation in
respect to the entry, anchorage, and wharfage of all vessels and other craft
entering into the ports of the State, and shall account for the same to the
State as hereinafter provided. The department shall keep a full and complete
record of the official acts of the department. [L 1911, c 163, §5; am L 1913, c
150, §3; RL 1925, §838; RL 1935, §1736; RL 1945, §4986; am L 1951, c 264, §2;
RL 1955, §112-8; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §26; HRS §266-7; am L 1978, c 231, §5;
am L 1979, c 21, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next